Washington statutes.
RCW 15.09.040

Meeting—Quorum—Officers.

Within thirty days after the appointed seats on the horticultural pest and disease board have been filled, the board shall conduct its first meeting. A majority of the voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and shall be necessary for any action taken by the board. The board shall elect from its members a chair and such other officers as may be necessary.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6017; 1969 c 113 s 4.]